Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Article 1. Dealers

§ 450.
Definition.

As used in this subchapter, “vehicle or motorboat” means a motor vehicle, snowmobile, motorboat, or all-terrain vehicle.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 50

, § 2.

§ 450a.
Dealer registration; eligibility.

A person shall not be eligible to register as a dealer unless the person:

Has no previous record of willful violations of dealer laws or regulations in this or any other jurisdiction.

For initial and renewal applicants, has not had a conviction or been incarcerated for a conviction for extortion, forgery, fraud, larceny, or embezzlement in this or any other jurisdiction within the 10 years prior to the application.

Has no unsatisfied judgments against the person arising out of violations of consumer protection laws in Vermont or any other jurisdiction.

Owns real estate (as defined in

1 V.S.A. § 132

) as his or her place of business or has a lease with an expiration date not earlier than the last day of the registration year for which registration is sought under the provisions of this subchapter, which includes a building of at least 1,200 square feet in size used primarily for the business of the dealership. The building shall have adequate facilities for the maintenance of the records required by law to be kept including those required by section 466 of this title.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, a person shall not be eligible to register as a dealer in cars, motor trucks, motorcycles, or motor-driven cycles unless the person presents proof of compliance with the provisions of section 800 of this title at the time application for registration is made.

In addition to the requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, a person shall not be eligible to register as a dealer in cars or motor trucks unless the person is open for business at least 146 days during the calendar year. The applicant shall provide the Commissioner with the hours of operation of the business that the person shall maintain during the registration period at the time of the application.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 50

, § 2.

§ 451.
Dealer’s certificate.

Instead of registering each motor vehicle owned by him or her, a dealer may apply under oath to the Commissioner, upon forms prescribed and furnished by the Commissioner for that purpose, and accompanied by such additional information and certifications as the Commissioner may reasonably require, for a general distinguishing number for such motor vehicles. If the Commissioner is satisfied that the applicant meets all the requirements of section 4 and chapter 7 of this title and is qualified to engage in such business, the Commissioner may issue to the applicant a certificate of registration containing the name, place of residence, and address of such applicant, the general distinguishing number assigned, and such additional information as the Commissioner may determine. If a dealer has a place of business or agency in more than one city or town, he or she shall file an application and secure a certificate of registration for each place of business or agency. The place of business or agency shall mean a place in any town where motor vehicles owned by a dealer are regularly kept or exposed for sale in the custody or control of the dealer or a salesman, employee, or agent of such dealer. In his or her discretion, the Commissioner may assign the same distinguishing number with more than one certificate to any dealer who has separate places of business within the same or an adjacent city or town within Vermont. The Commissioner may allow a dealer having one distinguishing number with more than one certificate to maintain only one central area for the maintenance of records required by law to be kept, including those required by section 466 of this title and for the transfer of motor vehicles. This location must be in Vermont and must be disclosed on the application prior to approval and may be changed only with the approval of the Commissioner or his or her agent. Dealer registration plates shall contain letters indicating the type of dealer certificate issued before the distinguishing number.

With the prior approval of the Commissioner, a Vermont dealer may display vehicles on a temporary basis, but in no instance for more than 14 consecutive days, at a fair, show, exhibition, or other off-site location. New vehicles may only be displayed off-site within the manufacturer’s stated area of responsibility in the franchise agreement. No sales may be transacted at these off-site locations. A dealer desiring to display vehicles temporarily at an off-site location shall notify the Commissioner in a manner prescribed by the Commissioner no less than two days prior to the first day for which approval is requested.

A dealer in new or used motor vehicles may temporarily transfer possession of a vehicle owned by the dealer on consignment to a registered auction dealer or Vermont licensed auctioneer to be sold at public or private wholesale auction by the auction dealer or Vermont licensed auctioneer.

The issuance of snowmobile, motorboat, and all-terrain vehicle dealer registrations are governed by this chapter and sections 3204, 3305, and 3504 of this title, respectively.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 204

, § 2;

1995, No. 19

, § 11, eff. April 17, 1995;

1995, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. April 22, 1996;

1999, No. 31

, § 3;

2013, No. 57

, § 8;

2015, No. 50

, § 2.

§ 452.
Expiration.

Unless otherwise specifically provided or unless canceled, revoked, or suspended, dealers’ registrations and certificates shall become void one year from the first day of the month of issue. The Commissioner may renew dealer registrations for two years and may stagger expiration dates.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 70

, § 5;

1999, No. 31

, § 4.

§ 453.
Fees and number plates.

An application for registration as a dealer in new or used cars or motor trucks shall be accompanied by a fee of $503.00 for each certificate issued in such dealer’s name. The Commissioner shall furnish free of charge with each dealer’s registration certificate three number plates showing the distinguishing number assigned such dealer. The Commissioner may furnish additional plates according to the volume of the dealer’s sales in the prior year or, in the case of an initial registration, according to the dealer’s reasonable estimate of expected sales, as follows:
(a) (1) An application for registration as a dealer in new or used cars or motor trucks shall be accompanied by a fee of $503.00 for each certificate issued in such dealer’s name. The Commissioner shall furnish free of charge with each dealer’s registration certificate three number plates showing the distinguishing number assigned such dealer. The Commissioner may furnish additional plates according to the volume of the dealer’s sales in the prior year or, in the case of an initial registration, according to the dealer’s reasonable estimate of expected sales, as follows:

under 20 sales: 0 additional plates;

20-49 sales: 1 additional plate;

50-99 sales: up to 5 additional plates;

100-249 sales: up to 12 additional plates;

250-499 sales: up to 17 additional plates;

500-749 sales: up to 27 additional plates;

750-999 sales: up to 37 additional plates;

1,000-1,499 sales: up to 47 additional plates;

1,500 or more: up to 57 additional plates.

If the issuance of additional plates is authorized under subdivision (1) of this subsection, up to two plates shall be provided free of charge, and the Commissioner shall collect $55.00 for each additional plate thereafter.

Application by a “dealer in farm tractors or other self-propelled farm implements,” which shall mean a person actively engaged in the business of selling or exchanging new or used farm tractors or other self-propelled farm implements, for such dealer registration shall annually be accompanied by a fee of $78.00. The Commissioner shall furnish free of charge with each such dealer registration certificate two sets of number plates showing the distinguishing number assigned such dealer and in his or her discretion may furnish further sets of plates at a fee of $12.00 per set; such number plates may, however, be displayed only upon a farm tractor or other self-propelled farm implement.

Application by a “dealer in motorized highway building equipment and road making appliances,” which shall mean a person actively engaged in the business of selling or exchanging new or used motorized highway building equipment or road making appliances, for such dealer registration shall annually be accompanied by a fee of $123.00. The Commissioner shall furnish free of charge with each such dealer registration certificate two sets of number plates showing the distinguishing number assigned such dealer and in his or her discretion may furnish further sets of plates at a fee of $30.00 per set; such number plates may, however, be displayed only upon motorized highway building equipment or road making appliances.

If a dealer is engaged only in the business of selling or exchanging motorcycles or motor-driven cycles, the registration fee shall be $62.00, which shall include three number plates. The Commissioner may, in his or her discretion, furnish further sets of plates at a fee of $10.00 for each set.

If a dealer is engaged only in the business of selling or exchanging trailers, semi-trailers, or trailer coaches, the registration fee shall be $123.00, which shall include three number plates; such number plates may, however, be displayed only upon a trailer, semi-trailer, or trailer coach. The Commissioner may, in his or her discretion, furnish further plates at a fee of $10.00 for each such plate.

In any year that number plates are reused and validation stickers are issued, the Commissioner shall not be required to issue new number plates to persons renewing registrations under this section.

The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall not issue a dealer’s certificate of registration to a dealer in new or used motor vehicles, unless the dealer has provided the Commissioner with a surety bond, letter of credit, or certificate of deposit issued by an entity authorized to transact business in the same state. The amount of such surety bond, letter of credit, or certificate of deposit shall be between $20,000.00 and $35,000.00, based on the number of new or used units sold in the previous year; such schedule is to be determined by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles. In the case of a certificate of deposit, it shall be issued in the name of the dealer and assigned to the Commissioner or his or her designee. The bond, letter of credit, or certificate of deposit shall serve as indemnification for any monetary loss suffered by the State or by a purchaser of a motor vehicle by reason of the dealer’s failure to remit to the Commissioner any fees collected by the dealer under the provisions of chapters 7 and 21 of this title or by a dealer’s failure to remit to the Commissioner any tax collected by the dealer under 32 V.S.A. chapter 219. This State or the motor vehicle owner who suffers such loss or damage shall have the right to claim against the surety upon the bond or against the letter of credit or certificate of deposit. The bond, letter of credit, or certificate of deposit shall remain in effect for the pending registration year and one year thereafter. The liability of any such surety or claim against the letter of credit or certificate of deposit shall be limited to the amount of the fees or tax collected by the dealer under chapters 7 and 21 of this title or 32 V.S.A. chapter 219 and not remitted to the Commissioner.

Applications by a snowmobile, motorboat, or all-terrain vehicle dealer shall be accompanied by the fees prescribed in sections 3204, 3305, and 3504 of this title, respectively.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 286

, § 4;

1967, No. 129

, § 6;

1977, No. 81

, § 3, eff. April 27, 1977;

1981, No. 87

, § 16;

1987, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1989, No. 51

, § 29;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 16, eff. May 15, 2002;

2009, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2009, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 19c, eff. Sept. 1, 2010;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 29;

2015, No. 50

, § 2;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 26.

§ 454.
Dealer’s use of vehicles or motorboats.

A motor vehicle owned by a dealer may be operated, while so owned, under the distinguishing number assigned to him or her as provided in this subchapter, for the following purposes and uses:

For the purpose of testing or adjusting the vehicle in the immediate vicinity of his or her place of business.

For some purpose directly connected with the dealer business, purchasing, selling, or exchanging motor vehicles by the dealer. The words “directly connected” for the purposes of this subdivision shall not be construed to include towing service unless the disabled vehicle is being towed to or from the dealer’s place of business for repair purposes, nor shall it include the transport of crushed vehicles unless all of the vehicles being so transported are properly recorded in the records of the dealer as required by section 466 of this title.

For a demonstration when the prospective purchaser is operating the vehicle, and then only for a period not to exceed three days.

For the temporary accommodation of a customer of the dealer when a motor vehicle properly registered under the law of the state of residence of the customer, because of crash or wear, is disabled and is left with the dealer for repairs and then only for a period not exceeding seven days.

For the private pleasure use of the dealer and members of his or her immediate family residing in the same household.

For the use of the vehicles at funerals or in public parades when no charge or rental is made for the use.

The word “dealer” for the purposes of subdivision (a)(5) of this section shall include such of the principal officers of a corporation registered as dealer and such of the partners in a co-partnership registered as dealer as are actively and principally engaged in the motor vehicle business and in any event shall include only those persons listed on the application for a registered dealer submitted to the Department, but shall not include directors and stockholders nor inactive and silent partners.

A snowmobile, motorboat, or all-terrain vehicle dealer may only use a dealer’s number plate or dealer registration number in accordance with sections 3204, 3305, and 3504 of this title, respectively.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 204

, § 9;

1975, No. 218

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 7a, 7b, eff. April 1, 1976;

1995, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. April 22, 1996;

2015, No. 50

, § 2.

§ 455.
Use by others than dealer.

A person, other than a dealer, shall not operate a motor vehicle under the provisions of section 454 of this title unless such person carries a written authority so to do signed by the dealer whose motor vehicle such person is operating.

§ 456.
Employees’ use of vehicles, motorboats restricted.

Employees of a dealer shall not operate, and a dealer shall not permit them to operate, vehicles or motorboats with dealer’s registration number plates or registration numbers displayed thereon, except for business purposes of the dealer, or in traveling directly between their homes and the place of their employer’s business.

HISTORY:

Amended

1995, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. April 22, 1996;

2015, No. 50

, § 2.

§ 457.
Temporary plates.

At the time of the issuance of a registration certificate to a dealer as provided in this chapter, the Commissioner shall furnish the dealer with a sufficient number of number plates and temporary validation stickers, temporary number plates, or temporary decals for use during the 60-day period immediately following sale of a vehicle or motorboat by the dealer. The plates and decals shall have the same general design as the plates or decals furnished individual owners, but the plates and decals may be of a material and color as the Commissioner may determine. The Commissioner shall collect a fee of $5.00 for each temporary plate issued.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 356

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1969, No. 276

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1975, No. 68

, § 2, eff. April 18, 1975;

1985, No. 30

, § 1;

1989, No. 51

, § 30;

1997, No. 39

, § 3;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. May 15, 2002;

2015, No. 47

, § 11;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 27.

§ 458.
Temporary plate on sold or exchanged vehicles.

On the day of the sale or exchange of a motor vehicle, motorboat, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle to be registered in this State, a dealer may issue to the purchaser, for attachment to the motor vehicle, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle, or to be carried in or on the motorboat, a number plate with temporary validation stickers, a temporary number plate, or a temporary decal, provided that the purchaser deposits with such dealer, for transmission to the Commissioner, a properly executed application for the registration of such motor vehicle, motorboat, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle and the required fee. If a properly licensed purchaser either attaches to the motor vehicle, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle or carries in the motorboat such number plate or decal, he or she may operate the same for a period not to exceed 60 consecutive days immediately following the purchase. An individual shall not operate a motor vehicle, motorboat, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle with a number plate with temporary validation stickers, a temporary number plate, or a temporary decal attached to the motor vehicle or carried in the motorboat except as provided in this section.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 356

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1975, No. 68

, § 3, eff. April 18, 1975;

1997, No. 39

, § 4;

2015, No. 47

, § 12;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 153.

§ 459.
Notice, application, and fees to Commissioner.

Upon issuing a number plate with temporary validation stickers, a temporary number plate, or a temporary decal to a purchaser, a dealer shall have 15 calendar days, or up to 30 calendar days as applicable pursuant to subsection 2015(b) of this title, to forward to the Commissioner the application and fee, deposited with him or her by the purchaser, together with notice of such issue and such other information as the Commissioner may require.

If a number plate with temporary validation stickers, a temporary registration plate, or a temporary decal is not issued by a dealer in connection with the sale or exchange of a vehicle or motorboat, the dealer may accept from the purchaser a properly executed registration, tax, and title application and the required fees for transmission to the Commissioner. The dealer shall have 15 calendar days, or up to 30 calendar days as applicable pursuant to subsection 2015(b) of this title, to forward to the Commissioner the application and fee together with such other information as the Commissioner may require.

HISTORY:

Amended

1987, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1999, No. 31

, § 5;

2009, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2015, No. 47

, § 13;

2019, No. 60

, § 21.

§ 460.
Dealer’s use of temporary plates restricted.

A dealer shall not use, attach, or issue temporary number plates except as provided in sections 458, 459, and 463 of this title.

§ 461.
Destruction of temporary plates.

Unless otherwise directed by the Commissioner, at the expiration of the period of 60 days, the purchaser shall destroy the temporary number plates.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 356

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1975, No. 68

, § 4, eff. April 18, 1975;

1997, No. 39

, § 5.

§ 462.
Cancellation, revocation, or suspension of dealer’s registration.

The Commissioner may cancel, revoke, or suspend the registration of a dealer under the provisions of this chapter or section 3204, 3305, or 3504 of this title whenever, after the dealer has been afforded the opportunity of a hearing before the Commissioner or upon conviction in any court in any jurisdiction, it appears that the dealer has willfully violated any vehicle or motorboat law of this State or any lawful regulation of the Commissioner applying to dealers, or when it appears that the dealer has engaged in fraudulent or unlawful practices related to the purchase, sale, or exchange of vehicles or motorboats. A dealer whose registration has been canceled, revoked, or suspended shall forthwith return to the Commissioner the registration certificate and any and all number plates or numbers or decals furnished him or her by the Commissioner, and the privilege to operate, purchase, sell, or exchange vehicles or motorboats under his or her dealer’s number shall cease. An application for a new dealer’s registration for that dealer will not be considered until a revocation period has been served.

A fee of $30.00 shall be paid to the Commissioner prior to the reinstatement of any dealer’s registration that has been suspended for cause.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 204

, § 4;

1987, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1997, No. 59

, § 74, eff. June 30, 1997;

1999, No. 31

, § 6;

2015, No. 50

, § 2.

§ 463.
Sale of vehicle to go out of State.

A registered motor vehicle dealer is authorized to issue an in-transit registration permit for the purpose of movement over the highways of certain motor vehicles otherwise required to be registered when these vehicles are sold in this State to be transported to and registered in another state or province. The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall, upon request, provide registered motor vehicle dealers with such numbers of applications and special in-transit number plates for vehicles sold in this State to be transported to and registered in another state or province as shall be necessary. The Commissioner is authorized to charge a fee of $6.00 for the processing of the plate application and the issuance of the plate. The dealer, upon the sale of a motor vehicle to be transported to and registered in another state or province, shall cause the application to be filled out and transmitted to the Commissioner and shall attach to the vehicle the in-transit number plate corresponding to the application. No registered motor vehicle dealer shall sell, exchange, give, or transfer any application or in-transit plate to any person other than the person to whom the dealer sells or exchanges a motor vehicle to be registered in another state or province. The application shall be in a form prescribed and furnished by the Commissioner. The special in-transit number plate to be attached to the vehicle will be issued in the form and design as prescribed by the Commissioner and shall be valid for a period of 30 days from the date of issue.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 356

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1975, No. 68

, § 5, eff. April 18, 1975;

1977, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1979, No. 30

, § 1, eff. April 17, 1979;

1985, No. 30

, § 2;

1989, No. 51

, § 31;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. May 15, 2002;

2003, No. 35

, § 1;

2009, No. 50

, § 45;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 28.

§ 464.
Return of number plates by dealer.

If a dealer comes into possession of a motor vehicle the registration of which has expired by reason of the provisions of section 321 of this title, and that has number plates attached, he or she shall immediately return such number plates to the Commissioner.

HISTORY:

Amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 154.

§ 465.
Loaning of plates, vehicles, or motorboats prohibited.

A dealer shall not lend or lease registration certificates, validation stickers, numbers, decals, or number plates that have been assigned to him or her under the provisions of this chapter, nor shall he or she lend or lease a vehicle or motorboat to which his or her dealer’s decals, numbers, or number plates have been attached, nor lend or lease his or her dealer’s decals, numbers, or number plates to a subagent.

HISTORY:

Amended

1999, No. 31

, § 7;

2015, No. 50

, § 2.

§ 466.
Records; custodian.

On a form prescribed or approved by the Commissioner, every licensed dealer shall maintain and retain for six years a record containing the following information, which shall be open to inspection by any law enforcement officer or motor vehicle inspector or other agent of the Commissioner during reasonable business hours:

Every vehicle or motorboat that is bought, sold, or exchanged by the licensee or received or accepted by the licensee for sale or exchange.

Every vehicle or motorboat that is bought or otherwise acquired and dismantled by the licensee.

The name and address of the person from whom such vehicle or motorboat was purchased or acquired, the date thereof, the name and address of the person to whom any such vehicle or motorboat was sold or otherwise disposed of and the date thereof, and a sufficient description of every such vehicle or motorboat by name and identifying numbers thereon to identify the same.

[Repealed.]

Every licensed dealer shall designate a custodian of documents who shall have primary responsibility for administration of documents required to be maintained under this title. In the absence of the designated custodian, the dealer shall have an ongoing duty to make such records available for inspection by any law enforcement officer or motor vehicle inspector or other agent of the Commissioner during reasonable business hours.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 259

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

1999, No. 31

, § 8;

2005, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2011, No. 46

, § 1;

2015, No. 50

, § 2;

2017, No. 206

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. May 30, 2018.

§ 467.
Dealer duty to report sales, return expired plates.

On a form prescribed by the Commissioner, a dealer shall send the reports of sale to the Commissioner upon the sale and relative to his or her sale or exchange of new or used vehicles or motorboats, and return to the Commissioner number plates coming into his or her possession through the sale or exchange of a motor vehicle, the registration of which has expired under the provisions of section 321 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1999, No. 31

, § 9;

2015, No. 50

, § 2.

§ 468.
General prohibition.

A dealer shall not operate a vehicle or motorboat nor permit the same to be operated under dealer’s registration numbers, except as specifically permitted in this chapter or under section 3204, 3305, or 3504 of this title. No charge shall be made for any permitted use.

HISTORY:

Amended

1999, No. 31

, § 10;

2015, No. 50

, § 2.

§§ 469-471.
Repealed. 1995, No. 188 (Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 472.
Evidence of authorization.

The Commissioner shall issue suitable documents of authorization of dealership that shall be displayed at the dealer’s place of business.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 204

, § 8.

§ 473.
When registration is allowed, required; penalties.

A person shall not engage in the business of selling or exchanging vehicles or motorboats, as defined in subdivision 4(8) of this title, without a dealer registration and obtaining dealer plates or motorboat registrations in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter and, if applicable, section 3204, 3305, or 3504 of this title. A person may register as a dealer only if he or she is engaged in the business of selling or exchanging vehicles or motorboats as defined in subdivision 4(8) of this title or, in the case of an initial registration, if the person’s reasonable estimate of expected sales or exchanges satisfies the minimum thresholds under subdivision 4(8) of this title. A person who violates this section shall be subject to the penalties established pursuant to section 475 of this title.

A person who misrepresents himself or herself as a dealer in the purchase, sale, or exchange of a vehicle or motorboat without registering as a dealer, or after the cancellation, suspension, or revocation of the dealer’s registration, or who makes misrepresentations to the Department in order to qualify for registration, shall be subject to the penalties established pursuant to section 475 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 204

, § 7;

1985, No. 12

, § 2; amended

1987, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1989, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1999, No. 31

, § 11;

2015, No. 50

, § 2.

§ 474.
Repealed.
1979, No. 30, § 3, eff. April 17, 1979.

§ 475.
Administrative penalties.

The Commissioner may impose an administrative penalty of not more than $500.00 for each violation against a dealer or a transporter who violates the provisions of this subchapter.

Each violation is a separate and distinct offense, and, in the case of a continuing violation, each day’s continuance may be deemed a separate and distinct offense. In no event shall the maximum amount imposed for a continuing offense exceed $1,000.00.

The Commissioner shall adopt rules establishing a schedule of administrative penalties to be imposed under this section. Penalties shall be based on the severity and frequency of the violation.

The alleged violator shall be given notice and opportunity for a hearing. Service of the notice shall be sufficient if sent by first-class mail to the address stated on the dealer’s certificate of registration. The notice shall include the following:

a factual description of the alleged violation;

a reference to the particular statute allegedly violated;

the amount of the proposed administrative penalty; and

a warning that the person will be deemed to have waived his or her right to a hearing, that the penalty will be imposed if no hearing is requested within 15 days from date of notice, and that failure to pay a penalty may result in suspension of his or her license.

A person who receives notice under subsection (d) of this section shall be deemed to have waived the right to a hearing unless, within 15 days from the date of the notice, the person requests a hearing in writing. If the person waives the right to a hearing, the Commissioner shall issue a final order finding the person in default and imposing the penalty.

The provisions of sections 105, 106, and 107 of this title shall apply to hearings conducted under this section.

The Commissioner may collect an unpaid administrative penalty by filing a civil action in Superior Court or through any other means available to State agencies.

If a penalty is not paid within 60 days after it is imposed, the Commissioner may suspend any license, certificate, registration, or permit issued under this subchapter.

The remedies authorized by this section shall be in addition to any other civil or criminal remedies provided by law for violation of this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 31

, § 12.

§ 476.
Motor vehicle warranty fee.

A motor vehicle warranty fee of $6.00 is imposed on the registration of each new motor vehicle in this State, not including trailers, tractors, motorized highway building equipment, road-making appliances, snowmobiles, motorcycles, motor-driven cycles, or trucks with a gross vehicle weight over 12,000 pounds.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 50

, § 56; amended

2009, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 19d, eff. Sept. 1, 2010;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 29.